Maryland, session 2025, SB0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0061*

SENATE BILL 61
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony and
is subject to imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000, or
both.
(c) (12) IT IS LAWFUL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERSON TO USE A
CELLULAR TELEPHONE OR ANOTHER DEVICE TO INTERCEPT AN ORAL
COMMUNICATION IN PUBLIC IF THE SPEAKER SHOULD REASONABLY ANTICIPATE
THAT THE ORAL COMMUNICATION COULD BE OVERHEARD OR INTERCEPTED.
(13) IT IS LAWFUL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERSON TO USE A
SECURITY CAMERA OR ANOTHER DEVICE INSTALLED ON OR ABOUT REAL PROPERTY
OWNED, LEASED, OR OTHERWISE LAWFULLY CONTROLLED BY THE PERSON TO
INTERCEPT AN ORAL COMMUNICATION ON THE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.